Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 11 Occupational Health and Safety
§ 27-11-114.
Limitations.

Nothing in this act [§§

27-11-101

through

27-11-114

] shall:

Limit or restrict the present jurisdiction or authority of the public service commission except employee safety and occupational health;

Supersede or limit the present authority for making rules and regulations pertaining to coal mines;

Affect the rules and regulations now in force until the commission shall adopt rules and regulations pertaining to noncoal mines and until the same shall become effective;

Affect the appointment of the state mine inspector and deputy mine inspectors;

Affect the powers and duties of the state mine inspector and deputy mine inspectors as to their present powers and duties until July 1, 1970.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 199, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 27-287.

Cross references. —

As to mines and mining generally, see title 30.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 27-11-103(a)(ix).